Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE A. HUNTING AND FISHING LICENSES

CHAPTER 44. GAME BREEDER'S LICENSE

Sec. 44.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Game breeder" means a person holding a valid game breeder's license.

(2) "Captivity" means the keeping of game animals in an enclosure suitable for and capable of retaining the animal it is designed to retain at all times under reasonable and ordinary circumstances and to prevent entry by another animal.

(3) "Game animal" means a pronghorn antelope, a collared peccary or javelina, or a red or gray squirrel.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 992 (H.B. 2026), Sec. 10, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 44.002. LICENSE REQUIREMENT. No person may sell, place in captivity, or engage in the business of propagating any game animal of this state unless the person has obtained a license issued under this chapter from the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1209, ch. 456, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 992 (H.B. 2026), Sec. 11, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 44.003. GAME BREEDER'S LICENSE. The department shall issue a game breeder's license on payment of a license fee of $10 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. The license is valid for a yearly period. Each yearly period begins on September 1 or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a license fee for a license issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this section and provide for a license term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1209, ch. 456, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1331, ch. 277, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 45, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 44.004. REISSUANCE OF LICENSE. A game breeder's license may not be issued to a previous licensee unless the licensee has filed with the department a copy of the record required by Section 44.007 of this code with an affidavit made before an officer qualified to administer oaths that the copy is true and correct.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 44.005. SERIAL NUMBER. (a) The department shall issue a serial number to the applicant at the time of the first issuance of a game breeder's license to the applicant. The same serial number shall be assigned to the licensee whenever he holds a game breeder's license.

(b) The game breeder shall place a suitable permanent tag bearing the game breeder's serial number on the ear of each pronghorn antelope or collared peccary or javelina held in captivity by the game breeder.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 50, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 992 (H.B. 2026), Sec. 12, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 44.006. LICENSE PRIVILEGES. The holder of a valid game breeder's license may:

(1) engage in the business of game breeding in the immediate locality for which the license was issued; or

(2) sell or hold in captivity for the purpose of propagation or sale a game animal.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1860, ch. 439, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 51, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 607, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 863, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 992 (H.B. 2026), Sec. 13, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 44.007. RECORDS. (a) Each game breeder shall keep a written record in a suitably bound book for the period from August 1 until the following July 31 or another yearly period established by the commission containing:

(1) the number and source of each kind of game animal on hand at the time the license is issued;

(2) the number, source, and date of receipt of each kind of game animal on hand at any time after the license is obtained;

(3) the number of each kind of game animal shipped or delivered, the date of shipment or delivery, and the name and address of persons to whom the shipment or delivery is made; and

(4) any other information determined by the commission to be necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(b) During August or another month set by the commission of each year, but before August 31 or another date established by the commission, a game breeder shall send to the department a report showing the information required by this section.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 2, eff. May 31, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 46, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 44.008. ENCLOSURE SIZE. A single enclosure for any game animal may not contain more than 320 acres.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 44.009. INSPECTION. An authorized employee of the department may inspect at any time and without warrant any pen, coop, or enclosure holding a game animal.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 44.010. SHIPMENT OF GAME ANIMALS. (a) A common carrier may not accept a live game animal unless the game animal is one listed in Section 44.006(2) of this code and the shipment is made by a game breeder.

(b) No person, except a game breeder or his authorized agent, may transport or ship a live game animal unless he obtains a permit for shipment or transportation from the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 44.011. PURCHASE AND SALE OF LIVE GAME ANIMALS. (a) Only game animals that are in a healthy condition may be sold, bartered, or exchanged, or offered for sale, barter, or exchange by a game breeder.

(b) No person may purchase or accept in this state a live game animal unless:

(1) the game animal bears a tag required by Section 44.005 of this code and is delivered or sold by a game breeder; or

(2) the game animal is delivered by a common carrier from outside this state.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 44.012. SALE DURING OPEN SEASON. A game animal held under the authority of a license issued under this subchapter may not be sold, traded, transferred, or shipped to any person in any county during an open season in the county of destination for taking the game animal or during a period of 10 days before the open season.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 52, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 44.0125. PROHIBITED ACTS. It is an offense if:

(1) a licensed game breeder takes, traps, or captures or attempts to take or capture game animals from the wild;

(2) a licensed game breeder allows the hunting or killing of a game animal held in captivity under the provisions of this chapter; or

(3) a person fails to furnish to a game warden commissioned by the department information as to the source from which game animals held in captivity were derived.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.013. USE OF PURCHASED GAME ANIMALS. (a) Except as provided in Subsection (b) of this section, game animals listed in Subdivision (2) of Section 44.006 of this code may be purchased or received in this state only for the purpose of liberation for stocking purposes or holding for propagation purposes. All game animals listed in Subdivision (2) of Section 44.006 of this code and increase from those game animals are under the full force of the laws of this state pertaining to wild game and the game animals may be held in captivity for propagation in this state only after a license is issued by the department under this chapter.

(b) Any game animal may be held, taken, or received for scientific and zoological purposes under a permit issued by the department pursuant to Section 43.022 of this code.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.014. APPLICATION OF GENERAL LAWS. In order that native game species may be preserved, game animals held under a game breeder's license are subject to all laws and regulations of this state pertaining to wild game animals except as specifically provided in this chapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 44.015. RIGHT OF DEPARTMENT. The department or an authorized employee of the department may take, possess, hold, transport, or propagate any game animal of this state for public purposes.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 44.016. PENALTIES. A person who violates a provision of this chapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.